California, session 20252026, AB1638.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) County veterans service officers generate higher benefits for the veterans who use their service, bringing more federal benefits to California. (b) More than 33,000 service members were discharged from active duty in California in 2019.(c) By providing these separating service members access to the benefits to which they are entitled, we can help new veterans offset the high cost of living in California, helping both the veteran and their family remain in California after they separate. (d) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure adequate resources are made available to California counties that are home to one or more active United States military bases so that they are able to station a county veterans service officer at each military base, at least part time, subject to base approval. SEC. 2. Section 972.3 is added to the Military and Veterans Code, to read:972.3. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, a county that hosts an active United States military base shall receive a stipend for the purposes of maintaining a county veterans service officer (CVSO), at least part time, on each active United States military base in the county, subject to base approval. A county shall not receive a stipend if the county chooses not to maintain a CVSO on a United States military base or the base in a county does not approve of a CVSO being maintained on that base.